Oklahoma, session 2025, SB514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.568, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1210.568. A. 1. Beginning with the first semester of


the 1996-1997 school year, the State Board of Education shall


implement a statewide system of alternative education programs which


shall be phased-in within seven (7) years. The statewide system


shall include but not be limited to Alternative Approaches grant


programs, funded pursuant to Section 1210.561 of this title, and



Req. No. 1376 Page 1


alternative academies or alternative programs implemented pursuant


to this section.


2. Beginning with the first semester of the 2020-2021 school


year, the State Board of Education shall implement a statewide


system of alternative education. The statewide system shall include


alternative education programs implemented pursuant to this section


and charter schools and virtual charter schools that have been


designated by the State Department of Education as implementing an


alternative education program.


B. All school districts of this state serving students in


grades seven through twelve shall provide alternative education


programs that conform to the requirements of statutes and rules


applicable to alternative education. A program shall:


1. Allow class sizes and student/teacher ratios which are


conducive to effective learning for at-risk students;


2. Incorporate appropriate structure, curriculum, and


interaction and reinforcement strategies designed to provide


effective instruction;


3. Include an intake and screening process to determine


eligibility of students;


4. Demonstrate that teaching faculty are appropriately


certified teachers;


5. Demonstrate that teaching faculty have been selected on the


basis of a record of successful work with at-risk students or

Req. No. 1376 Page 2


personal and educational factors that qualify them for work with at-


risk students;


6. Reflect appropriate collaborative efforts with state


agencies and local agencies serving youth;


7. Provide courses that meet the academic curricula standards


adopted by the State Board of Education and additional remedial


courses;


8. Offer individualized instruction;


9. State clear and measurable program goals and objectives;


10. Include counseling and social services components;


11. Require a plan leading to graduation be developed for each


student in the program which will allow the student to participate


in graduation exercises at the sending school or district after


meeting the requirements of the school district as specified in the


individual graduation plan for that student; provided, the


graduation plan required by this paragraph shall not be separate


from the plan required by Section 1210.508-4 of this title;


12. Offer life skills instruction;


13. Provide opportunities for hands-on arts education to


students, including artist residency programs coordinated with the


Oklahoma Arts Council;


14. Provide a proposed annual budget;


15. Be appropriately designed to serve middle school, junior


high school, and high school students in grades seven through twelve

Req. No. 1376 Page 3


who are most at risk of not completing a high school education for a


reason other than that identified in Section 13-101 of this title;


and


16. Allow students in the alternative education program, who


otherwise meet all of the participation requirements, to participate


in vocational programs and extracurricular activities at the sending


school or district, including, but not limited to athletics, band,


and clubs.


C. The alternative education program of a school district shall


be operational and serving students by September 1 of each school


year.


D. A school district may implement an alternative education


program using a full-time virtual education program or blended


instruction, as defined by Section 1-111 of this title.


E. Charter schools and virtual charter schools that have been


designated by the State Department of Education as implementing an


alternative education program shall be subject to:


1. A separate performance framework as provided for in


paragraph 18 of subsection A of Section 3-136 of this title; and


2. The attendance policies outlined in Section 3-145.8 of this


title.


F. 1. Each alternative education program of a school district


shall receive funding based on the average daily membership (ADM) of


students served by an alternative education program in the prior

Req. No. 1376 Page 4


school year according to the annual statistical report conducted by


the State Department of Education. The per-student funding amount


shall be based on the funding available for the program each fiscal


year.


2. Of the funding available for alternative education programs


each fiscal year, the State Department of Education shall designate


up to fifteen percent (15%) for districts participating in


cooperative agreements for alternative education services, which


shall be allocated on a pro rata basis as an incentive to each


participating district. The incentive amount received by each


district for participating in a cooperative agreement shall not


exceed Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) per fiscal year and shall be


in addition to the per-student funding amount required by paragraph


of this subsection. Any funds remaining after allocations


required by this paragraph are made shall be distributed to


districts in accordance with paragraph 1 of this subsection.


3. Statewide alternative education funding shall not be used to


supplant existing school district resources or to support programs


that do not meet all the criteria for the statewide alternative


education system.


E. G. All statewide alternative education funds received and


expended for students participating in an alternative education


program shall be reported to the State Department of Education by


major object codes and by program classifications pursuant to the

Req. No. 1376 Page 5


Oklahoma Cost Accounting System as adopted by the State Board of


Education pursuant to Section 5-135 of this title.


F. H. Elementary school districts, as defined in Section 5-103


of this title, may request a waiver by May 15 of each year from the


State Board of Education from the requirements of this section to


implement and provide an alternative education program. Any request


for a waiver shall be accompanied by an assurance that the school


district does not have students in need of alternative education


services. If a school district is granted a waiver, no statewide


alternative education funding shall be allocated to the district.


G. I. 1. The State Board of Education shall:


a. provide initial and ongoing training of personnel who


will educate at-risk populations through alternative


education programs,


b. provide technical assistance to school districts to


enhance the probability of success of their


alternative education programs,


c. evaluate state-funded alternative education programs,


d. report the evaluation results of state-funded


alternative education programs, and


e. provide in-depth program analysis and evaluation of


state-funded alternative education programs.





Req. No. 1376 Page 6


2. The State Board of Education may create an evaluation


schedule for effective and highly effective programs, requiring them


to be evaluated not less than once every three (3) years.


3. The State Board of Education may contract with a technical


assistance provider in order to meet the requirements of this


subsection.


4. The State Board of Education shall have the authority to


suspend funds for an alternative education program that does not


meet the requirements of subsection B of this section. Provided,


any school district under consideration for suspension of funds may


request a hearing before the Board with a review of the evaluation


prior to the Board’s final determination.


H. J. All alternative education programs shall be subject to


statutes and rules applicable to alternative education, including


any exemptions from statutory or regulatory requirements authorized


by statutes or rule.


I. K. An alternative education program may be offered by an


individual school district or may be offered jointly by school


districts that have formed interlocal cooperative agreements


pursuant to Section 5-117b of this title. Any school district


submitting a plan for an alternative education program serving fewer


than ten students shall enter into a cooperative agreement with


another school district to jointly provide the program unless the


program has been granted a waiver from this requirement by the State

Req. No. 1376 Page 7


Board of Education. A school district participating in a


cooperative agreement shall be required to send its alternative


education funding allocation to the cooperative.


J. L. Any materials or equipment purchased by a school district


with revenue received for students participating in an alternative


education program shall be used only in or directly for the


alternative education program offered by the district or any


subsequent alternative education program offered to students


enrolled in that district. Such materials and equipment shall be


made available exclusively to alternative education students during


the hours that the alternative education program is operating;


provided, the material or equipment may be used for other purposes


when the alternative education program is not operating.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1376 EB 1/19/2025 5:37:51 AM









Req. No. 1376 Page 8